Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-797
Livestock certification program; department; duties; registry.

The Department of Agriculture shall provide voluntary livestock certification programs when requested by a livestock health committee and others when deemed by the department to be beneficial and appropriate for the livestock industry. The department shall work together with the appropriate livestock producers or groups and the Department of Veterinary and Biomedical Sciences of the University of Nebraska to establish procedures for the certification of participating herds. The Department of Agriculture may maintain a livestock certification registry for each livestock certification program that provides information regarding the voluntary certification program and may include the names of participating livestock producers who have a herd or flock enrolled in the voluntary livestock certification program.

Laws 2001, LB 438, § 10;

Laws 2020, LB344, § 68.

Definitions, where found, see section 54-2902.